New Jersey, session 222, A2931.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  (New section)  A municipality may enter into a shared service agreement with any other municipality or municipalities in the State to transfer a portion of the fair share affordable housing obligation of one or more sending municipalities to one or more receiving municipalities.  A shared service agreement between one or more sending municipalities and one or more receiving municipalities shall be permissible regardless of whether the sending and receiving municipalities are in the same housing region, as established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2).  A shared service agreement entered pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-312). 2.  Section 2 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-302) is amended to read as follows: 2.  The Legislature finds that: a.     The New Jersey Supreme Court, through its rulings in Southern Burlington County NAACP v. Mount Laurel, 67 N.J. 151 (1975) and Southern Burlington County NAACP v. Mount Laurel, 92 N.J. 158 (1983), has determined that every municipality in a growth area has a constitutional obligation to provide through its land use regulations a realistic opportunity for a fair share of its region's present and prospective needs for housing for low- and moderate-income families. b.    In the second Mount Laurel ruling, the Supreme Court stated that the determination of the methods for satisfying this constitutional obligation "is better left to the Legislature," that the court has "always preferred legislative to judicial action in their field," and that the judicial role in upholding the Mount Laurel doctrine "could decrease as a result of legislative and executive action." c.     The interest of all citizens, including low- and moderate-income families in need of affordable housing, and the needs of the workforce, would be best served by a comprehensive planning and implementation response to this constitutional obligation. d.    There are a number of essential ingredients to a comprehensive planning and implementation response, including the establishment of reasonable fair share housing guidelines and standards, the initial determination of fair share by officials at the municipal level and the preparation of a municipal housing element, State review of the local fair share study and housing element, and continuous State funding for low- and moderate-income housing to replace the federal housing subsidy programs which have been almost completely eliminated. e.     The State can maximize the number of low- and moderate-income units provided in New Jersey by allowing its municipalities to adopt appropriate phasing schedules for meeting their fair share, so long as the municipalities permit a timely achievement of an appropriate fair share of the regional need for low- and moderate-income housing as required by the Mount Laurel I and II opinions and other relevant court decisions. f.     The State can also maximize the number of low- and moderate-income units by creating new affordable housing and by rehabilitating existing, but substandard, housing in the State.  Because the Legislature has determined, pursuant to P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.), that it is no longer appropriate or in harmony with the Mount Laurel doctrine to permit the transfer of the fair share obligations among municipalities within a housing region, it is necessary and appropriate to create a new program to create new affordable housing and to foster the rehabilitation of existing, but substandard, housing. g.    Since the urban areas are vitally important to the State, construction, conversion, and rehabilitation of housing in our urban centers should be encouraged.  However, the provision of housing in urban areas must be balanced with the need to provide housing throughout the State for the free mobility of citizens. h.    The Supreme Court of New Jersey in its Mount Laurel decisions demands that municipal land use regulations affirmatively afford a  realistic opportunity for a variety and choice of housing including low- and moderate-cost housing, to meet the needs of people desiring to live there.  While provision for the actual construction of that housing by municipalities is not required, they are encouraged but not mandated to expend their own resources to help provide low- and moderate-income housing. i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.2) j.     [The Legislature finds that the use of regional contribution agreements, which permits municipalities to transfer a certain portion of their fair share housing obligation outside of the municipal borders, should no longer be utilized as a mechanism for the creation of affordable housing by the council.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) k.    The Legislature finds that the role of the Council on Affordable Housing, as intended in the original enactment of the "Fair Housing Act," has not developed in practice as was intended in the legislation. l.     The council's inability to function ultimately led the Supreme Court in 2015 to order the temporary dissolution of the requirement that administrative remedies be exhausted prior to resolving affordable housing disputes before the court and allowed the courts to resume their role as the forum of first resort for evaluating municipal compliance with Mount Laurel obligations pursuant to guidelines laid out by the Supreme Court's order. m.   The Legislature finds that the council's inability to function led to a "gap period" that frustrated the intent of the Legislature and compliance with constitutional and statutory obligations and that it is necessary to establish definitive deadlines for municipal action and any challenges to those actions to avoid such a "gap period" from being repeated in the future. n.    The Legislature finds that although the court-led system that has developed since 2015 has resulted in a significant number of settlement agreements and increased production of affordable housing, the system could operate more expeditiously to produce affordable housing, and at a lower cost to all parties, if appropriate standards are established by the Legislature to be applied throughout the State, including more clarity on calculation on fair share affordable housing obligations using transparent and established data sources to eliminate the lengthy and costly processes of determining those obligations that have characterized both the Council on Affordable Housing and court-led system. o.    The Legislature determines that, considering the unique history of the "Fair Housing Act," the Council on Affordable Housing shall be abolished and that, pursuant to the formulas and process established pursuant to sections 6 and 7 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2 and C.52:27D-304.3), a municipality shall be authorized to seek approval of its fair share affordable housing obligation, adopted pursuant to binding resolution and then filed with the court, with the guidance of calculations published by the Department of Community Affairs, but that advocates for the low- and moderate-income households of the State shall be provided with an opportunity to contest the municipal determination. p.    The Legislature declares that the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), as amended and supplemented by P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), is intended to implement the Mount Laurel doctrine, and that municipalities in compliance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) are also in compliance with the Mount Laurel doctrine. q.    The Legislature finds that the population of persons aged 65 years and older in the State has grown from approximately 13 percent in 1990, to 17 percent in 2021, and that such growth, in conjunction with expected future growth, makes it appropriate for the Legislature to allow up to 30 percent of the units towards a municipality's prospective affordable housing obligation to be satisfied through the creation of age-restricted housing. r.  The "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) and the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.) were enacted concurrently to address the ruling of the New Jersey Supreme Court in Southern Burlington County NAACP v. Mount Laurel, 92 N.J. 158 (1983) and associated land use planning concerns. s.     The Legislature, in amending and supplementing the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), intends to facilitate comprehensive planning in alignment with smart growth principles and the State Development and Redevelopment Plan. t.     The Legislature declares that the changes made to affordable housing methodologies, obligations, and fair share plans, as determined to be a necessity by the Legislature, through the enactment of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), are made with the intention of furthering consistency with the State Development and Redevelopment Plan. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.1) 3.  Section 11 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-311) is amended to read as follows: 11.  a.  In adopting its housing element, the municipality may provide for its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing by means of any technique or combination of techniques which provide a realistic opportunity for the provision of the fair share.  The housing element shall contain an analysis demonstrating that it will provide such a realistic opportunity, and the municipality shall establish that its land use and other relevant ordinances have been revised to incorporate the provisions for low- and moderate-income housing.  In preparing the housing element, the municipality shall consider the following techniques for providing low- and moderate-income housing within the municipality, as well as such other appropriate techniques as have been established through applicable precedent and may be employed by the municipality: (1)   Rezoning for densities necessary to assure the economic viability of any inclusionary developments, either through mandatory set-asides or density bonuses, as may be necessary to meet all or part of the municipality's fair share in accordance with the provisions of subsection h. of this section; (2)   Determination of the total residential zoning necessary to assure that the municipality's fair share is achieved; (3)   Determination of measures that the municipality will take to assure that  low- and moderate-income units remain affordable to  low- and moderate-income households for an appropriate period of not less than the period required by the regulations adopted by the Department of Community Affairs pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-321); (4)   A plan for infrastructure expansion and rehabilitation and conversion or redevelopment of unused or underutilized real property, including existing structures, if necessary to assure the achievement of the municipality's fair share of low- and moderate-income housing; (5)   Donation or use of municipally owned land or land condemned by the municipality for purposes of providing low- and moderate-income housing; (6)   Tax abatements for purposes of providing low- and moderate-income housing; (7)   Utilization of funds obtained from any State or federal subsidy toward the construction of low- and moderate-income housing; (8)   Utilization of municipally generated funds toward the construction of low- and moderate-income housing; and (9)   The purchase of privately owned real property used for residential purposes at the value of all liens secured by the property, excluding any tax liens, notwithstanding that the total amount of debt secured by liens exceeds the appraised value of the property, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to subsection b. of section 41 of P.L.2000, c.126 (C.52:27D-311.2). b.    The municipality may provide for a phasing schedule for the achievement of its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing. c.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.46) d.    Nothing in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) shall require a municipality to raise or expend municipal revenues in order to provide low- and moderate-income housing. e.     When a municipality's housing element includes the provision of rental housing units in a community residence for the developmentally disabled, for the mentally ill, or for persons with head injuries, as those terms are defined in section 2 of P.L.1977, c.448 (C.30:11B-2), or in transitional housing, which will be affordable to persons of low- and moderate-income, and for which adequate measures to retain such affordability pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection a. of this section are included in the housing element, those housing units shall be fully credited towards the fulfillment of the municipality's fair share of low- and moderate-income housing.  A municipality shall not credit transitional housing units towards more than 10 percent of the municipality's fair share obligation. f.     It having been determined by the Legislature that the provision of housing under P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) is a public purpose, a municipality or municipalities may utilize public monies to make donations, grants or loans of public funds for the rehabilitation of deficient housing units and the provision of new or substantially rehabilitated housing for low- and moderate-income persons, providing that any private advantage is incidental. g.    A municipality that has received approval of its housing element and fair share plan for the current round, and that has actually effected the construction of the affordable housing units it is obligated to provide, may amend its affordable housing element or zoning ordinances without losing immunity from exclusionary zoning litigation. h.    Whenever affordable housing units are proposed to be provided through an inclusionary development, a municipality shall provide, through its zoning powers, incentives to the developer, which shall include increased densities and reduced costs. i.     A municipality and a developer may request a modification of a compliance certification involving reduced affordable housing set-asides or increased densities to ensure the economic feasibility of an inclusionary development, if any such application demonstrates how any shortfall in meeting the municipal fair share obligation will then be addressed.  Such a request may be granted only if the municipality and developer have demonstrated that the project has been impacted by market conditions beyond their reasonable control. j.     A municipality may enter into an agreement with a developer or residential development owner to provide a preference for affordable housing to low- and moderate-income veterans who served in time of war or other emergency, as defined in section 1 of P.L.1963, c.171 (C.54:4-8.10), of up to 50 percent of the affordable units in that particular project.  This preference shall be established in the applicant selection process for available affordable units so that applicants who are veterans who served in time of war or other emergency, as referenced in this subsection, and who apply within 90 days of the initial marketing period shall receive preference for the rental of the agreed-upon percentage of affordable units.  After the first 90 days of the initial 120-day marketing period, if any of those units subject to the preference remain available, then applicants from the general public shall be considered for occupancy. Following the initial 120-day marketing period, previously qualified applicants and future qualified applicants who are veterans who served in time of war or other emergency, as referenced in this subsection, shall be placed on a special waiting list as well as the general waiting list.  The veterans on the special waiting list shall be given preference for affordable units, as the units become available, whenever the percentage of preference-occupied units falls below the agreed upon percentage.  Any agreement to provide affordable housing preferences for veterans pursuant to this subsection shall not affect a municipality's ability to receive credit for the unit. k.  In the fourth round, and in subsequent rounds of affordable housing obligations, a municipality shall be able to receive one credit against its affordable housing obligation for each unit of low- or moderate-income housing and shall not receive bonus credit for any particular type of low- or moderate-income housing, unless authority to obtain bonus credit is expressly provided pursuant to this section or other sections of the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.).  A municipality shall not receive more than one type of bonus credit for any unit and a municipality shall not be permitted to satisfy more than 25 percent of its prospective need obligation in the fourth round or any subsequent round through the use of bonus credits.  This subsection shall not be construed to limit the ability of a municipality to receive a unit of credit for a low- or moderate-income housing unit that is subject to affordability controls that are scheduled to expire, but are extended pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-321), to the extent that this affordability control extension would otherwise generate this credit.  As a part of a fair share plan and housing element adopted pursuant to subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), a municipality shall: (1)  receive one unit of credit and one bonus credit for each unit of low- or moderate-income housing for individuals with special needs or permanent supportive housing, as those terms are defined in section 2 of P.L.2004, c.70 (C.34:1B-21.24); (2)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for each low- or moderate-income ownership unit created in partnership sponsorship with a non-profit housing developer; (3)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for each unit of low- or moderate-income housing located within a one-half mile radius, or one-mile radius for projects located in a Garden State Growth Zone, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-243), surrounding a New Jersey Transit Corporation, Port Authority Transit Corporation, or Port Authority Trans-Hudson Corporation rail, bus, or ferry station, including all light rail stations.  For the purpose of this subparagraph, the distance from the bus, rail, or ferry station to a housing unit shall be measured from the closest point on the outer perimeter of the station, including any associated park-and-ride lot, to the closest point of the housing project property; (4)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for a unit of age-restricted housing, provided that a bonus credit for age-restricted housing shall not be applied to more than 10 percent of the units of age-restricted housing constructed in compliance with the Uniform Housing Affordability Controls promulgated by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency in a municipality that count towards the municipality's affordable housing obligation for any single 10-year round of affordable housing obligations; (5)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for each unit of low- or moderate-income family housing with at least three bedrooms above the minimum number required by the bedroom distribution.  This bonus credit shall be calculated by taking into account the full municipal fair share plan and housing element, and the number of units with at least three bedrooms required for projects satisfying the minimum 50 percent family housing requirements.  A municipality shall receive the bonus credit pursuant to this paragraph for each unit with at least three bedrooms that are above the minimum number required for the bedroom distribution determined pursuant to the Uniform Housing Affordability Controls promulgated by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency; (6)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for a unit of low- or moderate-income housing constructed on land that is or was previously developed and utilized for retail, office, or commercial space; (7)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for each existing low- or moderate-income rental housing unit for which affordability controls are extended for a new term of affordability, in compliance with the Uniform Housing Affordability Controls promulgated by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, and the municipality contributes funding towards the costs necessary for this preservation; (8)  receive one unit of credit and one bonus credit for each unit of low- or moderate-income housing in a 100 percent affordable housing project for which the municipality contributes toward the costs of the project.  This contribution may consist of: (a) real property donations that enable siting and construction of the project or (b) contributions from the municipal affordable housing trust fund in support of the project, if the contribution consists of no less than three percent of the project cost; (9)  receive one unit of credit and one-half bonus credit for each unit of very low-income housing for families above the 13 percent of units required to be reserved for very low-income housing pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1).  In accordance with section 7 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1), a municipality shall not be required to provide that a specific percentage of the units in any specific project be reserved as very low-income housing in order to obtain this bonus credit, and the 13 percent level, for the purpose of bonus credits, shall be calculated against the full prospective need obligation provided pursuant to the fair share plan; and (10)  receive one unit of credit and one bonus credit for each unit of low- or moderate-income housing created by transforming an existing rental or ownership unit from a market rate unit to an affordable housing unit.  A municipality may only rely on this bonus credit as part of its fair share plan and housing element if the municipality demonstrates that a commitment to follow through with this market to affordable agreement has been made and: (a) this agreement has been signed by the property owner; or (b) the municipality has obtained ownership of the property. l.  A municipality may not satisfy more than 30 percent of the affordable housing units, exclusive of any bonus credits, to address its prospective need affordable housing obligation through the creation of age-restricted housing.  A municipality shall satisfy a minimum of 50 percent of the actual affordable housing units, exclusive of any bonus credits, created to address its prospective need affordable housing obligation through the creation of housing available to families with children and otherwise in compliance with the requirements and controls established pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-321).  A municipality shall satisfy a minimum of 25 percent of the actual affordable housing units, exclusive of any bonus credits, to address its prospective need affordable housing obligation, through rental housing, including at least half of that number available to families with children.  All units referred to in this section shall otherwise be in compliance  with the requirements and controls established pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-321). m.  All parties shall be entitled to rely upon regulations on municipal credits, adjustments, and compliance mechanisms adopted by the Council on Affordable Housing unless those regulations are contradicted by statute, including but not limited to P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), or binding court decisions. n.  P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.) shall not be construed to require a municipality to fund infrastructure improvements for affordable housing projects beyond any commitments made in a fair share plan and housing element that has been provided with compliance certification.  A municipality may fund infrastructure improvements for affordable housing projects, through the adoption of a development agreement with the applicant, beyond any commitments made in a fair share plan and housing element that has been provided with compliance certification. o.  A municipality may propose that a portion of its fair share be met through a shared service agreement pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The housing element shall demonstrate, however, the manner in which that portion will be provided within the municipality if the shared service agreement is not entered into or executed.  The municipality shall provide a statement of its reasons for the proposal. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.24) 4.  Section 12 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-312) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a.  [Except as prohibited under P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.), a] A municipality may propose [the] to transfer [of up to 50%] a portion of its fair share obligation to another municipality within [its housing region] the State by means of a [contractual] shared service agreement into which two or more municipalities voluntarily enter pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  A municipality [may also propose a transfer by contracting with the agency or another governmental entity designated by the council if the council determines that the municipality has exhausted all possibilities within its housing region.] shall not enter a shared service agreement to transfer more than 50 percent of its obligation to any one municipality.  A municipality proposing to transfer a portion of its fair share obligation to another municipality [, whether directly or by means of a contract with the agency or another governmental entity designated by the council,] shall provide the [council] department with the housing element and statement required [under subsection c.] pursuant to subsection o. of section 11 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-311) [, and shall request the council to determine a match with a municipality filing a statement of intent pursuant to subsection e. of this section.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, the agreement may be entered into upon obtaining substantive certification under section 14 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-314), or anytime thereafter]. The [regional contribution] shared service agreement entered into pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall specify how the housing shall be provided by [the second municipality, hereinafter the] a receiving municipality, and the amount of contributions to be made by [the first municipality, hereinafter the] a sending municipality. b.    A municipality which is a defendant in an exclusionary zoning suit and which has not obtained [substantive] compliance certification pursuant to P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) may request the court to be permitted to fulfill a portion of its fair share by entering into a [regional contribution] shared service agreement pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  If the court believes the request to be reasonable, the court shall request the [council] department to review the proposed agreement and to determine a match with a receiving municipality or municipalities [pursuant to this section] if a proposal is not provided by the defendant municipality.  The court may establish time limitations for the [councils] departments review, and shall retain jurisdiction over the matter during the period of [council] department review.  If the court determines that the agreement provides a realistic opportunity for the provision of [low and moderate income] low- and moderate-income housing within the housing region or the State, it shall provide the sending municipality [a] credit, in a manner consistent with section 11 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-311), against its fair share for housing to be provided through the agreement in the manner provided [in this section] pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  [The agreement shall be entered into prior to the entry of a final judgment in the litigation.  In cases in which a final judgment was entered prior to the date P.L.1985, c.222 takes effect and in which an appeal is pending, a municipality may request consideration of a regional contribution agreement; provided that it is entered into within 120 days after P.L.1985, c.222 takes effect.]  In a case in which a final judgment has been entered, the court shall consider whether or not the agreement constitutes an expeditious means of providing part of the fair share obligation.  [Notwithstanding this subsection, no consideration shall be given to any regional contribution agreement of which the council did not complete its review and formally approve a recommendation to the court prior to the effective date of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.).] c.     [Except as prohibited under P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.), regional contribution agreements] A shared service agreement entered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be approved by the [council,] department after review by the county planning board or agency of the county in which the receiving municipality is located.  The [council] department shall determine whether or not the agreement provides a realistic opportunity for the provision of [low and moderate income] low- and moderate-income housing within convenient access to employment opportunities.  The [council] department shall refer the agreement to the county planning board or agency, which shall review whether or not the [transfer] agreement is in accordance with sound, comprehensive regional planning.  In its review, the county planning board or agency shall consider the master plan and zoning ordinance of the sending and receiving municipalities, its own county master plan, and the State development and redevelopment plan.  In the event that there is no county planning board or agency in the county in which the receiving municipality is located, the [council] department shall also determine whether or not the agreement is in accordance with sound, comprehensive regional planning.  After it has been determined that the agreement provides a realistic opportunity for [low and moderate income] low- and moderate-income housing within convenient access to employment opportunities, and that the agreement is consistent with sound, comprehensive regional planning, the [council] department shall approve the [regional contribution] shared service agreement [by resolution] through a determination signed by the commissioner.  The determination, signed by the commissioner, with the proposal, shall be submitted to the Attorney General, who shall review the proposal to ensure that the agreement is appropriate and in harmony with the inclusionary requirements of the Mount Laurel Doctrine established by the Supreme Court in its Mount Laurel decisions.  After approval by the Attorney General, the department shall publish the commissioners determination on the departments Internet website. All determinations of a county planning board or agency shall be in writing and shall be made within such time limits as the [council] department may prescribe, beyond which the [council] department shall make those determinations and no fee shall be paid to the county planning board or agency pursuant to this subsection. d.    In approving a [regional contribution] shared service agreement entered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the [council] commissioner shall set forth in [its resolution] their determination a schedule of the contributions to be appropriated annually by the sending municipality.  A copy of the [adopted resolution] determination shall be filed promptly with the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the [Department of Community Affairs] department, and the director shall thereafter not approve an annual budget of a sending municipality if it does not include appropriations necessary to meet the terms of the [resolution] determination. Amounts appropriated by a sending municipality for a [regional contribution] shared service agreement entered pursuant to [this section] section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) are exempt from the limitations or increases in final appropriations imposed under P.L.1976, c.68 (C.40A:4-45.1 et seq.). e.     The [council] department shall maintain current lists of municipalities which have stated an intent to enter into [regional contribution] shared service agreements pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) as receiving municipalities, and shall establish procedures for filing statements of intent with the [council] department. No receiving municipality shall be required to accept a greater number of [low and moderate income] low- and moderate-income income units through an agreement than it has expressed a willingness to accept in its statement, but the number stated shall not be less than a reasonable minimum number of units, not to exceed 100, as established by the [council] department. The [council] department shall require a project plan from a receiving municipality prior to the entering into of the agreement, and shall submit the project plan to the agency for its review as to the feasibility of the plan prior to the [councils] departments approval of the agreement.  The agency may recommend and the [council] department may approve as part of the project plan a provision that the time limitations for contractual guarantees or resale controls [low and moderate income] low- and moderate-income units included in the project shall be less than 30 years, if it is determined that modification is necessary to assure the economic viability of the project. f.     The [council] department shall establish guidelines for the duration and amount of contributions in [regional contribution] shared service agreements entered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  In doing so, the [council] department shall give substantial consideration to the average of: (1) the median amount required to rehabilitate a [low and moderate income] low- and moderate-income unit up to code enforcement standards; (2) the average internal subsidization required for a developer to provide a [low income] low-income housing unit in an inclusionary development; and (3) the average internal subsidization required for a developer to provide a [moderate income] moderate-income housing unit in an inclusionary development.  Contributions may be prorated in municipal appropriations occurring over a period not to exceed ten years and may include an amount agreed upon to compensate or partially compensate the receiving municipality for infrastructure or other costs generated to the receiving municipality by the development. Appropriations made by a sending municipality pursuant to a shared service agreement entered pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be made and paid [directly] to the department. Following payment receipt, the department shall submit the details of the payment to the Attorney General for review and approval.  After obtaining approval from the Attorney General, the department shall provide the payment to the receiving municipality or municipalities or to the agency or other governmental entity designated by the [council] department, as the case may be. g.    The [council] department shall require receiving municipalities to file annual reports with the agency setting forth the progress in implementing a project funded under a [regional contribution] shared service agreement pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and the agency shall provide the [council] department with its evaluation of each report.  The [council] department shall take such actions as may be necessary to enforce a [regional contribution] shared service agreement with respect to the timely implementation of the project by the receiving municipality. [No consideration shall be given to any regional contribution agreement for which the council did not complete its review and grant approval prior to the effective date of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.).  On or after the effective date of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.), no regional contribution agreement shall be entered into by a municipality, or approved by the council or the court.] (cf: P.L.2008, c.46, s.16) 5.  This act shall take effect immediately.